Illinois, session 104th, SB3147.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 801.1, 802.1, 803.1, 804.1, 805.1, 806.1, 6807.1, 808.1, 809.1, 810.1, 811.1, 813.1, 814.1, 815.1, and 7817.1 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 5/801.1)9    Sec. 801.1. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 10require insurers to make mine subsidence insurance coverage 11available for residences, living units and commercial 12buildings located in Illinois; to establish the Illinois Mine 13Subsidence Insurance Fund; to divide the Fund into separate 14residential and commercial sub-funds; and to make the Fund a 15taxable, private the reinsurer for the mine subsidence 16insurance made available under this Article.17(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 18    (215 ILCS 5/802.1)19    Sec. 802.1. Definitions. As used in this Article:20    (a) "Commercial building Building" means any building that 21is classified by the insurer as a commercial building and is , 22other than a residence, permanently affixed to realty located   SB3147- 2 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1in Illinois, including basements, footings, foundations, 2septic systems and underground pipes directly servicing the 3building. "Commercial building" does not include any other 4improvements to real property, including, without limitation, 5but does not include sidewalks, driveways, parking lots, 6living units, land, landscaping, lawns, trees, plants, crops, 7or agricultural field drainage tile.8    (b) "Commercial coverage Coverage" means mine subsidence 9insurance for a commercial building.10    (b-5) "Director" means the then-appointed, then-acting, or 11then-interim Director of Insurance. 12    (c) "Insurer" or "insurers" "Insurers" means an insurance 13company or companies, farm mutuals, and reciprocals licensed 14and authorized to write Class 3 policies of insurance, as 15defined in this Code, within Illinois.16    (d) "Living unit Unit" means shall mean that physical 17portion designated for separate ownership or exclusive 18occupancy for residential purposes, of a building or group of 19buildings, permanently affixed to realty located in Illinois, 20having elements which are owned or used in common, including a 21condominium unit, a cooperative unit or any other similar 22unit.23    (e) "Living unit coverage Unit Coverage" means mine 24subsidence insurance for a living unit covering the losses 25described in Section 805.1(d).26    (f) "Mine subsidence Subsidence" means lateral or vertical   SB3147- 3 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1ground movement caused by a failure initiated at the mine 2level, of man-made underground mineral mines, including, but 3not limited to coal mines, clay mines, limestone mines, and 4fluorspar mines that directly damages residences, living 5units, or commercial buildings. "Mine subsidence Subsidence" 6does not include lateral or vertical ground movement caused by 7anything other than a failure initiated at the mine level of 8man-made underground mineral mines, including, but not limited 9to, surface mining, earthquake, landslide, volcanic eruption, 10soil conditions, soil erosion, soil freezing and thawing, 11improperly compacted soil, construction defects, roots of 12trees and shrubs or collapse of storm and sewer drains and 13rapid transit tunnels.14    (g) "Mine Subsidence Insurance Fund" or "Fund" means the 15private fund established by this Article.16    (h) "Policy" or "policies" means any contract or contracts 17of insurance providing the coverage of the Standard Fire 18Policy and Extended Coverage Endorsement, or substantial 19equivalent, on any residence, living unit, or commercial 20building. It does not include those insurance contracts that 21are referred to as marine or inland marine policies or that 22reinsure the liability of another, whether or not those 23insurance contracts are designated as reinsurance policies.24    (i) "Premium" or "premiums" means the gross amount charged 25to policyholders for the mine subsidence insurance made 26available under this Article.  SB3147- 4 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1    (j) "Rates" or "rate schedules" means the rates by which 2premiums shall be computed for the mine subsidence insurance 3made available under this Article.4    (k) "Residence" means a building that is classified by the 5insurer as a residence and used principally for residential 6purposes up to and including a 4-family four family dwelling, 7permanently affixed to realty located in Illinois, including 8appurtenant structures, driveways, sidewalks, basements, 9footings, foundations, septic systems and underground pipes 10directly servicing the dwelling or building. "Residence" does 11not include any other improvements to real property, 12including, without limitation, but does not include living 13units, land, landscaping, lawns, trees, plants, crops or 14agricultural field drainage tile.15    (l) "Residential coverage Coverage" means mine subsidence 16insurance for a residence.17    (m) "Intergovernmental cooperative" means an 18intergovernmental cooperative organized pursuant to Article 19VII, Section 10 of the Illinois Constitution and Section 6 of 20the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.21(Source: P.A. 90-499, eff. 8-19-97.) 22    (215 ILCS 5/803.1)23    Sec. 803.1. Establishment of Fund. 24    (a) There is established a private fund to be known as the 25"Illinois Mine Subsidence Insurance Fund". The Fund shall   SB3147- 5 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1operate pursuant to this Article. The Fund is authorized to 2transact business, provide services, enter into contracts, and 3sue or be sued in its own name.4    (b) The Fund shall provide reinsurance for mine subsidence 5losses to all insurers writing mine subsidence insurance 6pursuant to this Article who have properly executed a 7reinsurance agreement with the Fund in a form filed with and 8approved by the Director.9    (c) The moneys monies in the Fund shall be derived 10primarily from premiums for mine subsidence insurance ceded by 11insurers to the Fund collected on behalf of the Fund pursuant 12to this Article and , from investment income and from receipt 13of Federal or State funds. No insurer shall have any liability 14to the Fund or to any creditor of the Fund, except as may be 15set forth in this Article, in the Articles of Governance which 16may be adopted by the Fund, in a reinsurance agreement 17executed pursuant to Section 810.1, in the Plan of Operation 18established by the Fund, or in the rules and procedures 19adopted by the Fund as authorized by the reinsurance 20agreement.21    (d) The Fund shall establish its rates, rating schedules, 22deductibles and retentions, minimum premiums, classifications, 23and the maximum amount of reinsurance available per residence, 24commercial building, and living unit for mine subsidence 25insurance which the Fund shall file with the Director. The 26Director shall have 30 days from the date of receipt to approve   SB3147- 6 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1or disapprove a rate filing. If no action is taken by the 2Director within 30 days after filing, the filing , the rate is 3deemed to be approved. The Director may, in writing, extend 4the period for an additional 30 days if the Director 5determines that additional time is needed.6    (e) The Fund shall establish its rates, rating schedules, 7deductibles and retentions, minimum premiums, classifications, 8and the maximum amount of reinsurance available per residence, 9commercial building, and living unit in such a manner as to 10satisfy all reasonably foreseeable claims and expenses the 11Fund is likely to incur. In establishing the mine subsidence 12insurance premium rates, the The Fund shall give due 13consideration to factors reasonably considered by an insurer 14when setting premium rates, including loss experience and 15relevant trends, premium and other income and reasonable 16reserves established for contingencies; in addition, the Fund 17shall give due consideration to the fact that it does not 18receive taxpayer funding or have the ability to issue 19assessments to the insurance industry to support its long-term 20financial viability in establishing the mine subsidence rates.21    (f) The Fund shall compile and publish an annual operating 22report.23    (g) The Fund shall maintain or make available develop at 24least 2 consumer information publications to aid the public in 25understanding mine subsidence and mine subsidence insurance 26and shall establish a schedule for the distribution of the   SB3147- 7 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1publications pursuant to the reinsurance agreement. Topics 2that shall be addressed shall include but are not limited to: 3        (1) Descriptive information about mine subsidence, and 4    what benefits mine subsidence insurance provides to the 5    property owner. 6        (2) Information that will be useful to a policyholder 7    who has filed a mine subsidence claim, such as information 8    that explains the claim investigation process and claim 9    handling procedures.10    (h) The Fund shall be empowered to sponsor, fund, or 11conduct research programs in an effort to improve the 12administration of the mine subsidence insurance program and 13help reduce and mitigate mine subsidence losses consistent 14with the public interest.15    (i) The Fund may enter into reinsurance agreements with 16any intergovernmental cooperative that provides joint 17self-insurance for mine subsidence losses of its members. 18These reinsurance agreements shall be substantially similar to 19reinsurance agreements described in Section 810.1.20(Source: P.A. 95-92, eff. 1-1-08; 95-334, eff. 1-1-08.) 21    (215 ILCS 5/804.1)22    Sec. 804.1. Management of the Fund. 23    (a) The Fund shall be governed managed by an 11-member 11 24member Board of Directors, 6 of whom shall be designated as 25insurance industry-elected industry directors, 4 of whom shall   SB3147- 8 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1be designated as public-appointed public directors, and one of 2whom shall be designated as an Illinois-licensed Illinois 3licensed insurance producer public-appointed director. The 4industry directors shall be elected to 3-year staggered terms 5annually in the manner provided in Articles of Governance 6adopted by the Fund. The public directors shall be appointed 7to 3-year staggered terms by the Director, and shall not be 8employees of or otherwise affiliated with the insurance 9industry. The Illinois-licensed Illinois licensed insurance 10producer shall be appointed to a 3-year term by the Director. 11All directors shall be independent and owe a duty of care and 12duty of loyalty to the Fund. 13    (b) Each member of the Board of Directors on the effective 14date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 15shall continue to be a member of the Board of Directors until 16the conclusion of that Director's existing 3-year term or, in 17the case of an appointed director, until the Director makes an 18official appointment, whichever is later. The members of the 19Governing Committee of the Illinois Mine Subsidence Insurance 20Fund established by Article XXXVIII who are members of the 21Governing Committee as of December 31, 1993 shall become the 22members of the Board of Directors of the Fund established by 23this Article on the effective date of this Act, and shall 24continue to hold office until the next annual meeting of the 25Fund.26    (c) No later than the date of the next annual meeting of   SB3147- 9 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1the Fund following the effective date of this Act, the 2Director shall appoint 4 public directors, one for a one-year 3term, one for a two-year term and 2 for three-year terms. No 4later than the date of the next annual meeting of the Fund 5following the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1994, 6the Director shall appoint the Illinois licensed insurance 7producer for a 2-year term. Thereafter, all public directors 8and the licensed insurance producer shall be appointed for 3 9year terms.10    (c) The (d) As soon as practical after the effective date 11of this Act, the Fund shall adopt Articles of Governance, 12which shall be submitted to the Director for his review and 13approval. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend the 14Articles of Governance, subject to review and approval by the 15Director. 16(Source: P.A. 88-379; 88-667, eff. 9-16-94; 89-206, eff. 177-21-95.) 18    (215 ILCS 5/805.1)19    Sec. 805.1. Mine Subsidence Coverage. 20    (a) Beginning January 1, 1994, every policy issued or 21renewed insuring a residence on a direct basis shall include, 22at a separately stated premium, residential coverage unless 23waived in writing by the insured. Beginning January 1, 1994, 24every policy issued or renewed insuring a commercial building 25on a direct basis shall include at a separately stated   SB3147- 10 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1premium, commercial coverage unless waived in writing by the 2insured. Beginning January 1, 1994, every policy issued or 3renewed insuring a living unit on a direct basis shall 4include, at a separately stated premium, living unit coverage 5unless waived in writing by the insured.6    (b) If the insured has previously waived mine subsidence 7coverage in writing, the insurer or agent shall provide 8written notice of the availability of need not offer mine 9subsidence coverage in conjunction with any renewal or 10supplementary policy in connection with a policy previously 11issued to such insured by the same insurer, but need not obtain 12an additional written waiver of mine subsidence coverage 13unless the insured subsequently makes a written request for 14mine subsidence coverage.15    (c) The premium charged for residential, commercial or 16living unit coverage shall be the premium level set by the 17Fund. The loss covered shall be the loss in excess of any 18applicable the deductible or retention in established by the 19Fund and contained in a mine subsidence endorsement to the 20policy, subject to the limit of insurance for mine subsidence 21damage stated in the policy; however, for all policies issued 22or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, there shall be no 23deductible or retention applicable to mine subsidence damage. 24For all policies issued or renewed on or after the effective 25date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 26January 1, 2008, the maximum amount of reinsured loss per   SB3147- 11 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1residence, per commercial building, and per living unit shall 2be the amounts established by the Fund and approved by the 3Director. For all policies issued or renewed on or after 4January 1, 1996, the amount of reinsurance available from the 5Fund shall not be less than $200,000 per residence, $200,000 6per commercial building, or $15,000 per living unit. The Fund 7may, from time to time, adjust the amount of reinsurance 8available as long as the minimum set by this Section is met.9    (d) The residential and living unit coverage provided 10pursuant to this Article may also cover, as part of the cost of 11repairs of covered mine subsidence damage to a residence or 12living unit, the costs of debris removal, moving and storage 13of contents, and repair or replacement of landscaping, but 14only if made necessary by the repairs of covered mine 15subsidence damage to a residence or living unit and only when 16and to the extent such costs are actually incurred. 17    (e) (d) The residential and living unit coverage provided 18pursuant to this Article may also cover the additional living 19expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred by the owner of a 20residence who has been temporarily displaced as the direct 21result of damage to the residence or living unit caused by mine 22subsidence if the underlying policy also covers this type of 23loss, except provided however, that the additional living 24expenses loss covered under living unit coverage shall be 25limited to those additional living expenses incurred by an 26owner who has been temporarily displaced as the direct result   SB3147- 12 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1of damage losses to improvements and betterments caused by 2mine subsidence , and reimbursement of additional living 3expenses and special assessments made against the insured on 4account of mine subsidence loss and shall be paid within, and 5not in addition to, the applicable limit for residential or 6living unit coverage.7    (f) (e) The total amount of the loss reimbursable to an 8insurer shall be limited to the amount of insurance reinsured 9by the Fund in force at the time when the damage first becomes 10reasonably observable, as determined by the Fund. All damage 11caused by a single mine subsidence event or several subsidence 12events which are continuous, as determined by the Fund, shall 13constitute one occurrence. As set forth in subsections (a) and 14(c) of this Section, a policy issued or renewed must provide 15coverage, unless waived in writing by the insured, and the 16insurer must continue to charge the premium level set for that 17coverage by the Fund. If mine subsidence coverage is in force 18when the mine subsidence damage first becomes reasonably 19observable, and the mine subsidence occurrence is still 20ongoing, then the insurer shall notify the insured making the 21mine subsidence claim that continuation of that coverage 22thereafter may not be necessary and is optional, but that 23continued coverage on the damaged residence, living unit, or 24commercial building shall terminate only upon written waiver 25by the insured. The notification shall be made within 60 days 26after the insurer receives written confirmation from the Fund   SB3147- 13 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1that the cause of loss is active mine subsidence. The 2notification shall be in the form of a separate mailing to the 3insured from the insurer through via the United States Postal 4Service or other commercial mail delivery service and shall 5include notification to the insured that mine subsidence 6premiums paid for coverage on a damaged residence, living 7unit, or commercial building subsequent to the established 8date of loss shall be refunded to the insured within 60 days 9after the insured provides a signed waiver of mine subsidence 10coverage to the insurer. The notification shall be accompanied 11by a waiver of coverage form for the insured to sign and return 12to the insurer.13    (g) (f) No insurer shall be required to offer mine 14subsidence coverage in excess of the reinsured limits as 15established from time to time by the Fund and approved by the 16Director.17(Source: P.A. 98-1007, eff. 1-1-15.) 18    (215 ILCS 5/806.1)19    Sec. 806.1. Division of Fund Into Separate Residential and 20Commercial Sub-funds.21    (a) Effective January 1, 1994, the Fund shall establish 2 22separate sub-funds, a Residential Fund to provide reinsurance 23for mine subsidence losses arising from residential and living 24unit coverage and a Commercial Fund to provide reinsurance for 25mine subsidence losses arising from commercial coverage. The   SB3147- 14 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1assets and liabilities of the Fund shall be allocated to the 2 2two sub-funds in such manner as determined by the Board of 3Directors, with the approval of the Director. The 2 two 4sub-funds shall continue to be governed managed by the Board 5of Directors. Beginning January 1, 1994, all premiums received 6by the Fund for residential coverage or living unit coverage 7shall be credited to the Residential Fund, all losses and 8expenses for residential coverage or living unit coverage 9shall be charged to the Residential Fund. All premiums 10received by the Fund for commercial coverage shall be credited 11to the Commercial Fund, and all losses and expenses for 12commercial coverage shall be charged to the Commercial Fund. 13The Fund's overhead expenses shall be allocated between the 14Residential Fund and the Commercial Fund on the basis of 15annual written premium credited to each sub-fund. The assets 16and liabilities of the Residential and Commercial Funds shall 17be accounted for separately. The assets of the Residential 18Fund shall not be used to reimburse insurers for losses for 19Commercial Coverage and the assets of the Commercial Fund 20shall not be used to reimburse insurers for losses for 21residential coverage or living unit coverage.22    (b) No insurer shall be required to pay any claim for any 23loss reinsured under this Article except to the extent that 24the amount available in the Residential Fund or the Commercial 25Fund, as the case may be, is sufficient to reimburse the 26insurer for such payment.  SB3147- 15 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1(Source: P.A. 88-379; 89-206, eff. 7-21-95.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/807.1)3    Sec. 807.1. Exemption of Certain Counties by the Director. 4The Director shall exempt from the obligations of subsection 5(a) of Section 805.1 every policy insuring residences, living 6units or commercial buildings located in any county of 71,000,000 or more inhabitants or any county contiguous to any 8such county, and, upon request of the Fund, may exempt every 9policy insuring residences, living units or commercial 10buildings located in any other specified county of this State, 11from the provisions of subsection (a) of Section 805.1 of this 12Article. However, in any county exempted by this Section from 13the obligations of subsection (a) of Section 805.1, an insurer 14shall make available mine subsidence coverage upon request by 15a policyholder. The Fund shall maintain and make available to 16insurers a list of the exempt and non-exempt counties as 17described in this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 19    (215 ILCS 5/808.1)20    Sec. 808.1. Right of Insurers to Refuse to Provide Mine 21Subsidence Coverage. An insurer may refuse to provide mine 22subsidence coverage on a residence, living unit, or commercial 23building evidencing unrepaired mine subsidence damage until 24such damage has been repaired.  SB3147- 16 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/809.1)3    Sec. 809.1. Arbitration. In the event of a dispute between 4a policyholder and an insurer as to whether a residence, 5living unit, or commercial building covered by mine subsidence 6insurance has been damaged by mine subsidence, when the damage 7first became reasonably observable, or whether damage was 8caused by one occurrence (a single mine subsidence event or 9several subsidence events that are continuous) or multiple 10occurrences, both the a policyholder and the insurer shall 11each have the right to submit that dispute to arbitration in 12accordance with this Section. Such arbitration, if demanded by 13either party, shall be mandatory and preclude the policyholder 14and the insurer from filing, pursuing, or continuing with 15litigation of the issue in any other forum. The arbitration 16award shall be binding on both the policyholder and the 17insurer. Neither the No policyholder nor the insurer shall 18have the right under this Section to submit to arbitration any 19other issue regarding the amount of loss or damage caused to a 20residence or commercial building by mine subsidence.21    Arbitration may be initiated only after the insurer has 22notified the policyholder in writing, accompanied by a notice 23informing the policyholder of the policyholder's right to 24arbitration and containing specific reference to this Section, 25of the Fund's determination of whether a residence, living   SB3147- 17 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1unit, or commercial building covered by mine subsidence 2insurance has been damaged by mine subsidence, when the damage 3first became reasonably observable, or whether damage was 4caused by a single mine subsidence event or several subsidence 5events that are continuous. Arbitration shall be initiated and 6conducted Arbitration may be initiated only after the insurer 7has made a decision that the residence or commercial building 8covered by mine subsidence insurance was not damaged by mine 9subsidence and so notified the policyholder in writing, 10accompanied by a notice informing the policyholder of the 11policyholder's right to arbitration and containing specific 12reference to this Section. Within 60 days after receipt by the 13policyholder of the notification, the policyholder may 14initiate arbitration in accordance with the Commercial 15Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association, as 16then in effect, before a panel of 3 arbitrators, unless the 17parties mutually agree, after the demand for arbitration is 18made, to have a single arbitrator. All costs of the 19arbitration shall be borne by the losing party. Appeals from 20the decision of the arbitrators shall be in accordance with 21the Uniform Arbitration Act as in effect in Illinois.22(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 23    (215 ILCS 5/810.1)24    Sec. 810.1. Reinsurance Agreements. To obtain reinsurance 25from the Fund for mine subsidence coverage offered under this   SB3147- 18 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1Article, an insurer All insurers shall execute and return to 2the Fund, prior to receipt by the insurer of any mine 3subsidence claim for which reinsurance is sought, enter into a 4reinsurance agreement with the Fund in a form updated from 5time to time by the Board of Directors and . The reinsurance 6agreement shall be filed with and approved by the Director. 7The agreement, which may include a specific effective date and 8expiration date, shall provide that each insurer shall cede 9100% of any mine subsidence insurance written up to the limits 10then established and in effect pursuant to subsection (c) of 11contained in Section 805.1(c) to the Fund and, in 12consideration of the ceding commission retained by the 13insurer, agrees to distribute informational publications 14provided by the Fund on a schedule set by the Fund, undertake 15adjustment of losses, payment of taxes, and all other expenses 16of the insurer necessary for sale of policies and 17administration of the mine subsidence insurance coverage. The 18Fund shall agree to reimburse the insurer for all amounts 19reasonably and properly paid to policyholders from claims 20resulting from mine subsidence and for expenses specified in 21the reinsurance agreement. In addition, the reinsurance 22agreement may contain, and may authorize the Fund to establish 23and promulgate deductibles. The reinsurance agreement may also 24contain reasonable provisions, rules, and procedures related 25to underwriting standards; language that insurers must include 26or not include in mine subsidence coverage forms used by   SB3147- 19 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1insurers; remitting of premiums to the Fund; rules and 2procedures covering insurer documentation of losses; insurer 3reporting of premiums, claims, loss payments, and reports of 4litigation, premiums and loss payments; loss payment review by 5the Fund; determinations of whether claimed damage was caused 6by mine subsidence, when mine subsidence damage was first 7reasonably observable, and whether movement was continuous; 8handling and adjustment of claims for damage caused by mine 9subsidence; control and direction of litigation or arbitration 10involving whether claimed damage was caused by mine 11subsidence, when mine subsidence damage was first reasonably 12observable, or whether movement was continuous or that may 13affect the interests of the Fund; subrogation; remitting of 14premiums to the Fund; underwriting; and cause and origin 15investigations; and procedures for resolving disputes between 16the insurers and the Fund.17(Source: P.A. 90-655, eff. 7-30-98; 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 18    (215 ILCS 5/811.1)19    Sec. 811.1. Distribution of Premiums. The Fund is 20authorized to establish, by way of the reinsurance agreement, 21Plan of Operation, or operating rules and procedures, the 22proportion of total mine subsidence insurance premiums 23collected by each insurer which shall be retained by the 24insurer as a ceding commission, subject to review of the 25Director. The remainder of such premiums shall be remitted by   SB3147- 20 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1the insurer to the Fund at times to be determined by the Fund. 2The ceding commission rate for residential mine subsidence 3coverage and commercial mine subsidence coverage may differ, 4but the commission rates commission shall be uniform in all 5reinsurance agreements entered into pursuant to Section 810.1 6of this Article and shall be based on reasonable 7administrative costs to the insurers, including agents' 8commissions.9(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 10    (215 ILCS 5/813.1)11    Sec. 813.1. Reporting Requirements. Every insurer must 12report, at times designated by the Fund, such information as 13is reasonably required by the Fund to conduct its affairs, 14including, without limitation, information regarding losses 15incurred and paid, premiums written and collected, and 16exposures insured. Insurers must cooperate with the Fund's 17periodic examination and audit of the insurer's mine 18subsidence insurance books and records and with reasonable 19data requests necessary to evaluate and price the exposure 20establish claim reserves, and reimburse insurers for losses 21paid to insureds.22(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 23    (215 ILCS 5/814.1)24    Sec. 814.1. Right of Recourse and Setoff.   SB3147- 21 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1    (a) The Fund shall have no right of recourse against the 2insurer, once the Fund has reimbursed the insurer for any 3particular loss, unless the insurer has failed to settle that 4loss in its customary manner, or in case of fraud by the 5insurer.6    (b) The Fund may seek recovery against the policyholder 7for unjust enrichment if, in the Fund's judgment, the 8policyholder was not entitled to the amounts paid because of 9fraud, or a material violation of the policy conditions. The 10insurer shall provide cooperation to the Fund.11    (c) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this Article, 12the insurer's residential coverage, living unit coverage, and 13commercial coverage forms shall include a provision stating 14that the amount of insurable loss to a residence, living unit, 15or commercial building caused by mine subsidence shall be 16reduced by the amounts received by any current or former owner 17of that structure from a third party in exchange for a mine 18subsidence waiver or a release of liability for past or future 19mine subsidence damage in favor of that third party. If an 20insurer's residential coverage, living unit coverage, or 21commercial coverage forms do not include such a provision, the 22Fund's reinsurance obligation to the insurer shall be limited 23to the amount that would have been paid by the insurer and 24reinsured by the Fund had the forms included such a provision. 25(Source: P.A. 88-379.)   SB3147- 22 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1    (215 ILCS 5/815.1)2    Sec. 815.1. Subrogation. 3    (a) The insurer's residential coverage, living unit 4coverage, and commercial coverage forms shall include a 5provision stating that the policyholder shall do nothing after 6a loss to impair the policyholder's rights of recovery against 7third parties. An insurer issuing residential coverage, living 8unit coverage, or commercial coverage All insurers issuing 9mine subsidence policies shall retain the right of subrogation 10and do nothing after the loss to impair that right.11    (b) The Fund, on its own behalf, may exercise the right of 12subrogation to the extent permitted by law.13    (c) Upon request by the Fund, an insurer with a reinsured 14claim shall assign to the Fund any rights of subrogation it may 15have, whether or not the rights of subrogation transfer to the 16Fund by operation of law Every insurer shall include in its 17reports an itemized list of all losses in subrogation and 18shall remit to the Fund all monies, less expenses, recovered 19as the result of subrogation actions.20(Source: P.A. 88-379.) 21    (215 ILCS 5/817.1)22    Sec. 817.1. Powers of Director. In addition to any powers 23conferred upon the Director him by this or any other law, the 24Director shall have the authority to regulate supervise the 25operations of the Fund as set forth in this Article and shall   SB3147- 23 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1review the Fund's rates once every 3 three years. In addition, 2the Director or any person designated by the Director him has 3the power: 4        (a) to examine the operation of the Fund through free 5    access to all books, records, files, papers and documents 6    relating to its operation and may summon, qualify and 7    examine as witnesses all persons having knowledge of such 8    operation, including officers, agents or employees 9    thereof; 10        (b) to do all things necessary to enable the State of 11    Illinois and any insurer participating in any program 12    approved by the Director to fully participate in any 13    federal program which may be enacted for purposes similar 14    to the purposes of this Article; 15        (c) to require such reports as the Director may deem 16    necessary.17(Source: P.A. 90-655, eff. 7-30-98.)  SB3147- 24 -LRB104 17970 BAB 31407 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    215 ILCS 5/801.14    215 ILCS 5/802.15    215 ILCS 5/803.16    215 ILCS 5/804.17    215 ILCS 5/805.18    215 ILCS 5/806.19    215 ILCS 5/807.110    215 ILCS 5/808.111    215 ILCS 5/809.112    215 ILCS 5/810.113    215 ILCS 5/811.114    215 ILCS 5/813.115    215 ILCS 5/814.116    215 ILCS 5/815.117    215 ILCS 5/817.1